apertium-eo-en.eo.dix
    <pardef n="nom__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nomf__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nommf__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ino</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inoj</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inon</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inojn</l> 
        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="la__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mia__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dem__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ind__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quant__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>j</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>jn</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ser__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itan</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itajn</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>intaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ajna">
        <i>ajna</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="alia">
        <i>alia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ambaŭ">
        <i>amba</i><par n="ŭ"/><i></i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="amiko">
        <i>amik</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anekdoto">
        <i>anekdoto</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="atakanto">
        <i>atakant</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="avalo">
        <i>avalo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="breto">
        <i>breto</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="certa">
        <i>certa</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉampiono">
        <par n="ĉ"/>
        <i>ampion</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
        <par n="ĉ"/>
        <i>iu</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">
        <par n="ĉ"/>
        <i>iu</i> 
        <par n="quant__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="deklivo">
        <i>deklivo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dirigento">
        <i>dirigent</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diversa">
        <i>diversa</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="duŝo">
        <i>du</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>o</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="entrudulo">
        <i>entrudul</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="esprimo">
        <i>esprimo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="esti">
        <i>est</i> 
        <par n="ser__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="finalisto">
        <i>finalist</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="geometro">
        <i>geometr</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="graso">
        <i>graso</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝia">
        <par n="ĝ"/>
        <i>ia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ilia">
        <i>ilia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="incitanto">
        <i>incitant</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="iu">
        <i>iu</i> 
        <par n="quant__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kalvaria vojo">
        <i>kalvaria vojo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kelka">
        <i>kelka</i> 
        <par n="quant__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kelnero">
        <i>kelner</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kremo">
        <i>kremo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la">
        <i>la</i> 
        <par n="la__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="la sama">
        <i>la<b/>sama</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="laekzekutivo">
        <i>laekzekutiv</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lia">
        <i>lia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malmulta">
        <i>malmulta</i> 
        <par n="quant__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marioneto">
        <i>marioneto</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mia">
        <i>mia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="monpruntisto">
        <i>monpruntist</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="multa">
        <i>multa</i> 
        <par n="quant__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="neniu">
        <i>neniu</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nia">
        <i>nia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="odo">
        <i>odo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pentristo">
        <i>pentrist</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="portilo">
        <i>portilo</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="reganto">
        <i>regant</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="risorto">
        <i>risorto</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="subjekto">
        <i>subjekto</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝatanto">
        <par n="ŝ"/>
        <i>atant</i> 
        <par n="nommf__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝia">
        <par n="ŝ"/>
        <i>ia</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tia">
        <i>tia</i> 
        <par n="ind__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tiu">
        <i>tiu</i> 
        <par n="dem__det"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="turbino">
        <i>turbino</i> 
        <par n="nom__n"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="via">
        <i>via</i> 
        <par n="mia__det"/> 
    </e>
